Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.470

Action to enjoin violation of chapter.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or of any order made pursuant to this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

[ 1959 c 139 s 47.]